New Mexico, session 2026, HB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] NEW MEXICO-IRELAND TRADE COMMISSION--MEMBERSHIP--DUTIES--ANNUAL REPORT.-- A. The "New Mexico-Ireland trade commission" is established and administratively attached to the economic development department. B. Members of the commission shall include the director of the division of international trade of the economic development department or the director's designee and the following members who have knowledge of or involvement in organizations that promote Irish affairs or have interest in the well-being of trade relations between New Mexico and Ireland and are appointed as follows: (1) three members appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate; (2) two members appointed by the minority floor leader of the senate; (3) three members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (4) two members appointed by the minority floor leader of the house of representatives; and (5) six members appointed by the governor, including: (a) one member from a state institution of higher education; (b) one member who is a member of an Indian nation, tribe or pueblo; (c) one member who is involved with a New Mexico agricultural business; (d) one member who is involved with a New Mexico oil or gas energy business; and (e) two members of the public who are members of different political parties and who represent Irish-American communities or interests in New Mexico. C. Appointments to the New Mexico-Ireland trade commission shall be made to stagger the terms of the members so that: (1) the terms of two of the initial members appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate and one of the initial members appointed by the minority floor leader of the senate shall be for two years; and the terms of the remaining initial member and all subsequent members appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate and the remaining initial member and all subsequent members appointed by the minority floor leader of the senate shall be for four years; (2) the terms of two of the initial members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one of the initial members appointed by the minority floor leader of the house of representatives shall be for two years; and the terms of the remaining initial member and all subsequent members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the remaining initial member and all subsequent members appointed by the minority floor leader of the house of representatives shall be for four years; and (3) three of the initial members appointed by the governor shall be appointed for two years and three shall be appointed for four years, and all subsequent appointments by the governor shall be for four-year terms. D. Appointments shall be made not later than ninety days following the effective date of this 2026 act. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment. E. The commission may accept gifts, grants, donations, money from fundraising activities, bequests and other forms of voluntary contributions to carry out the purposes of the commission. F. The commission shall: (1) annually elect a chair and vice chair from among the commission's members; (2) meet virtually or in person at least once annually and at the call of the chair; (3) work to advance bilateral trade and investment between New Mexico and Ireland with emphasis on the technology, agricultural and energy sectors; (4) initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest between New Mexico and Ireland; (5) promote business and academic exchanges between New Mexico and Ireland; (6) encourage mutual economic support between New Mexico and Ireland; (7) encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of New Mexico and Ireland; and (8) on or before December 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, submit to the governor, the president pro tempore of the senate, the minority floor leader of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority floor leader of the house of representatives and the secretary of economic development a report that includes the commission's findings, results and recommendations. G. The division of international trade of the economic development department shall provide staff to the New Mexico-Ireland trade commission as required to fulfill the purposes of the commission. - 5 -